hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Főzőedények és sütőedények > Főzőedények: Pörkölőedények; Rakott ételek; Főzőedénykészletek; Palacsinta- és Blini-sütők; Kettős kazánok; Holland sütők; Erjesztő- és savanyítóedények; Rácsok és grillserpenyők; Grillprések; Paellaserpenyők; Gyorsfőzők és befőzők; Fazékok; Párolóedények; Tepsik és serpenyők; Levesesfazekak; Tűzhelyes vízforralók; Főzőlapon gőzölők; Tajinék és agyagos főzőedények; Wokok
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Articole pentru gătit și copt > Vase de gătit: Cratițe pentru înăbușit; Tăvi de servit cu capac; Seturi de vase de gătit; Tigăi pentru clătite și blini; Seturi de oale bain-marie; Cuptoare olandeze; Oale pentru fermentare și murături; Plite și tigăi pentru grătar; Prese pentru grătar; Tigăi pentru paella; Oale sub presiune și oale pentru conserve; Cratițe pentru sosuri; Tigăi pentru sotare; Cratițe și tigăi pentru prăjit; Oale pentru supă; Ceainice pentru aragaz; Vase pentru gătit la abur pentru aragaz; Oale tagine și oale de lut; Tigăi wok
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 炊具/烘焙用具 > 炊具: 炖锅; 砂锅餐具; 炊具套装; 薄饼/煎饼平底锅; 双层锅; 荷兰炖锅; 发酵/腌制缸; 浅锅/平底锅; 烧烤压板; 海鲜饭专用平底锅; 压力锅/压力罐; 长柄炖锅; 平底炒锅; 长柄平底煎锅; 汤锅; 烧水壶; 炉灶蒸锅; 塔吉锅/砂锅; 炒锅/大勺
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Съдове за готвене и печене > Съдове за готвене: Тигани за задушаване; Касероли; Комплекти съдове за готвене; Тигани за палачинки и блини; Съдове с двойно дъно; Холандски фурни; Съдове за ферментация и консервиране; Плочи и тигани за грил; Преси за скара; Тигани за паеля; Тенджери под налягане и консервиране; Тенджери; Тигани за сотиране; Чугунени тигани и тигани за пържене; Тенджери за бульони; Чайници за котлон; Уреди за готвене на пара на котлон; Таджини и глинени съдове за готвене; Уок тигани
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Nádoby na varenie a pečenie > Hrnce: Panvice na dusenie mäsa; Zapekacie misy; Súpravy hrncov; Panvice na francúzske palacinky a blini; Dvojité hrnce; Holandské pece; Súdky na fermentáciu a kvasenie; Rošty a grilovacie panvice; Kontaktné grily; Panvice na paellu; Tlakové a zaváracie hrnce; Kastróly; Panvice na soté; Rajnice a panvice; Hrnce na vývar; Varné kanvice; Parné hrnce na sporák; Hlinené nádoby tagine a hlinené hrnce; Woky
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > Ocak ve Fırında Pişirme Gereçleri > Pişirme Kapları: Güveç Tencereleri; Güveçler; Ocakta Pişirme Gereci Setleri; Krep ve Bilini Tavaları; Benmariler; Hollanda Fırınları; Mayalama ve Turşu Bidonları; Saç Izgaralar ve Izgara Tavaları; Izgara Presleri; Paella Tavaları; Düdüklü Tencereler ve Konserve Tencereleri; Sos Tavaları; Sote Tavaları; Sahanlar ve Kızartma Tavaları; Et Suyu Kazanları; Ocak Üstü Su Isıtıcılar; Ocak Üstü Buharlı Pişiriciler; Tajineler ve Pişirme Çömlekleri; Wok Tavalar
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Nádobí na vaření a pečení > Kuchyňské nádobí: Pánve na dušení; Zapékací mísy; Sady nádobí na vaření; Pánve na palačinky; Napařovací hrnce; Holandské hrnce; Hrnce na kvašení a nakládání; Pánve na pečení a grilování; Grilovací lisy; Pánve na paellu; Tlakové a zavařovací hrnce; Pánve; Pánve na soté; Pekáče a pánve na smažení; Polévkové hrnce; Konvice na kamna; Napařovače na sporák; Nádoby tagine; Pánve wok
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 조리/제빵 도구 > 조리 도구: 브레이저 팬; 캐서롤 용기; 취사도구 세트; 크레이프/블리니 팬; 이중 냄비; 더치오븐; 발효/절임음식 보관함; 그리들/그릴팬; 그릴 프레스; 파에야 팬; 압력솥/용기; 냄비; 소테 팬; 스킬릿/프라이팬; 곰솥; 주전자; 가스레인지용 스티머; 타진/토기 냄비; 웍
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > 調理器具 > 鍋・フライパン: ブレイザーパン; キャセロール鍋; 鍋・フライパンセット; クレープパン・ブリニパン; 湯煎鍋; ダッチオーブン; 漬物容器; グリドル・グリルパン; グリルプレス; パエリアパン; 圧力鍋・キャンナー; ソースパン; ソテーパン; スキレット・フライパン; 寸胴・スープ鍋; やかん; コンロ用蒸し器; タジン鍋・土鍋; 中華鍋
it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Pentolame e tegami da forno > Pentole e tegami: Padelle per brasare; Casseruole; Set di pentole; Pentole per crêpe; Bagnomaria; Casseruole di ghisa; Vasi per fermentazione e conservazione sottaceto; Pentole piastre e griglie; Presse griglia; Pentole paella; Pentole a pressione e per cottura a vapore; Pentole; Padelle; Casseruole e padelle; Tegami; Bollitori; Vaporiere da fornello; Tajine e pentole in argilla; Wok
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Kaitlentės ir orkaitės indai > Kaitlentės indai: Troškinimo keptuvės; Troškintuvai; Kaitlentės indų rinkiniai; Lietinių ir blynų keptuvės; Puodai dvigubu dugnu; Olandiški orkaitės puodai; Fermentavimo ir marinavimo puodynės; Kepimo padėklai ir kepsninės keptuvės; Kepsninių svoriai; Paelijos keptuvės; Greitpuodžiai ir konservų sterilizavimo puodai; Prikaistuviai; Gilios keptuvės; Keptuvės; Sultinio puodai; Katilai viryklei; Ant viryklės naudojami garintuvai; Tažinai ir moliniai puodai; Vokai
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > อุปกรณ์ทำอาหารและอุปกรณ์อบอาหาร > อุปกรณ์ที่ใช้ประกอบอาหาร: กระทะเบรเซอร์; ชามก้นลึกสำหรับอบหรือปิ้ง; ชุดอุปกรณ์ทำอาหาร; กระทะเครปและแพนเค้ก; หม้อต้มคู่; หม้ออบดัตช์; หม้อหมักและดอง; กระทะแบนและกระทะปิ้งย่าง; ที่กดสำหรับปิ้งย่าง; กระทะสเปน; หม้อต้มที่ใช้ความอัดดันจากไอน้ำและแคนเนอร์; กระทะท้องแบน; กระทะก้นแบน; กระทะสำหรับทอด; หม้อน้ำซุปขนาดใหญ่; กาต้มน้ำ; เครื่องนึ่งแบบใช้บนเตา; หม้อทำอาหาร Tagines และหม้อดิน; กระทะเหล็กบางขนาดใหญ่
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Posode za kuhanje in peko > Posode za kuhanje: Ponve za dušenje; Posode za enolončnice; Kompleti posode za kuhanje; Ponve za palačinke in bline; Lonci za parno kuhanje; Nizozemske pečice; Keramične posode za fermentacijo in kisanje; Mreže in ponve za žar; Stiskalniki za žar; Ponve za paello; Ekonom lonci in aparati za konzerviranje; Kozice; Ponve za sotiranje; Žar ponve in ponve za cvrtje; Lonci za juho; Kuhalniki vode za štedilnike; Parni kuhalniki na štedilniku; Tagini in glineni lonci za kuhanje; Voki
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Ruuanlaitto- ja leivontatarvikkeet > Ruuanlaittotarvikkeet: Haudutuspannut; Uunivuoat; Ruuanlaittosetit; Lettu- ja blinipannut; Kerroskattilat; Padat; Fermentointi- ja hapatusruukut; Parilat ja grillipannut; Grilliprässit; Paellapannut; Painekeittimet ja säilöntälaitteet; Kattilat; Paistokasarit; Paistinpannut ja skillet-pannut; Liemikattilat; Teepannut; Liedellä käytettävät höyrystimet; Tajinet ja saviastiat; Wokit
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Matlagnings- og bakeutstyr > Matlagningsutstyr: Braiserpanner; Ildfaste former; Matlagningssett; Crêpe- og blinipanner; Dobbeltstekere; Jerngryter; Fermenterings- og syltekrukker; Grillpanner; Grillpresser; Paellapanner; Trykkokere og -bokser; Kasseroller; Sautépanner; Jern- og stekepanner; Sausegryter; Tekokere; Dampkokere til komfyrtopp; Taginer og leirefat; Woker
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Posuđe za kuhanje i pečenje > Posuđe za kuhanje: Tave za pirjanje; Pekači; Kompleti posuđa za kuhanje; Tave za palačinke i bline; Lonci s dvostrukim dnom; Nizozemske pećnice; Lonci za fermentaciju i kiseljenje; Gradele i tave za roštilj; Preše za roštilj; Tave za paellu; Ekspres lonci i lonci za kuhanje pod tlakom; Tave za umake; Tave za pirjanje; Tavice i tave za prženje; Lonci za juhu; Čajnici za štednjak; Uređaji za kuhanje na pari na štednjaku; Tajine i glinene posude za kuhanje; Wokovi
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Panelas e assadeiras > Panelas: Panelas de caçarola; Caçarolas; Conjuntos de panelas; Panelas para crepe; Panelas para banho-maria; Panelas de ferro; Barril de fermentação e conserva; Fritadeiras e grelhas; Prensas para grelhar; Panelas para paellas; Panelas de pressão e conservas; Panelas para molho; Panelas para sauté; Caçarolas e fritadeiras; Caldeirões; Chaleiras; Vaporizadores de fogão; Tagines; Woks
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 調理烘焙鍋具 > 鍋具: 燉鍋; 焗烤碗盤; 廚房用具組; 可麗餅煎盤和小鬆餅鍋; 雙層鍋; 荷蘭鍋; 發酵缸/醃漬缸; 燒烤盤; 燒烤用壓板; 西班牙海鮮飯鍋; 壓力鍋具; 醬汁鍋; 深煎鍋; 平底鍋具; 湯鍋; 燒水壺具; 爐用蒸鍋; 塔吉鍋/砂鍋; 炒鍋
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Kookgerei en bakvormen > Kookbenodigdheden: Braadpannen; Braadschotels; Pannensets; Pannenkoekpannen; Au-bain-mariepannen; Gietijzeren pannen; Kruiken voor het fermenteren van gerechten en het maken van tafelzuur; Grillpannen en -platen; Contactgrill; Paellapannen; Snelkookpannen en weckketels; Steelpannen; Sauteerpannen; Koekenpannen; Bouillonketels; Fluitketels; Stoompannen voor op het fornuis; Tajines; Wokken
fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Matériel de cuisson et de pâtisserie > Ustensiles de cuisson: Braisières; Terrines; Batteries de cuisine; Poêles à crêpes; Bains-marie; Cocottes; Pots de fermentation et saloirs; Plaques de cuisson et poêles-grils; Presses de gril; Poêles à paëlla; Autocuiseurs; Casseroles; Sauteuses; Poêles et poêles à frire; Marmites; Bouilloires non électriques; Cuiseurs vapeur pour cuisinière; Tajines et plats de cuisson en terre cuite; Woks
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Garnki i formy do pieczenia > Garnki: Brytfanny; Formy do zapiekanek; Zestawy garnków; Patelnie na naleśniki crêpe i bliny; Bemary; Kociołki; Garnki gliniane do fermentacji i marynowania; Patelnie grillowe; Prasy do grilla; Patelnie do paelli; Szybkowary i urządzenia do konserwowania pod ciśnieniem; Rondle; Patelnie saute; Patelnie i rondle; Garnki do zup; Czajniki na gaz; Parowary; Tażiny i gliniane garnki do gotowania; Woki
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Kochgeschirr & Backformen > Kochgeschirr: Schmorpfannen; Auflaufformen & Kasserollen; Kochgeschirrsets; Pfannen für Crêpes und Pfannkuchen; Wasserbadtöpfe; Schmortöpfe; Rum- & Einmachtöpfe; Grillpfannen & -aufsätze; Grillpressen; Paellapfannen; Schnell- & Einkochtöpfe; Stieltöpfe; Sautépfannen; Stiel- & Bratpfannen; Suppentöpfe; Wasserkessel; Dampfgarer für den Herd; Tajines & Tonkochtöpfe; Woks
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Dụng cụ nấu và nướng > Đồ nấu bếp: Chảo om; Đĩa đựng thịt hầm; Bộ đồ nấu; Chảo làm bánh crepe và bánh blini; Bình đun cách thủy; Lò quay; Fermentation và Pickling Crocks; Chảo và vỉ nướng; Dụng cụ ép đồ nướng; Chảo làm cơm thập cẩm; Nồi áp suất; Xoong; Chảo Sauté; Chảo rán; Nồi hầm; Ấm đun nước; Xửng hấp; Nồi sứ tagine; Chảo xào
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Verktyg för matlagning och bakning > Kokkärl: Bräseringspannor; Eldfasta former och grytor; Kokkärlsset; Crêpe- och blinipannor; Dubbelkastruller; Stekgrytor; Lerkärl för fermentering och inläggning; Bordsgrillar och grillpannor; Grillpressar; Paellastekpannor; Tryckkokare; Kastruller; Traktörpannor; Stekpannor; Soppgrytor; Vattenkittlar; Ångkokningsinsatser; Taginer och lergrytor; Wokar
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Кухонная и жаропрочная посуда > Кухонная посуда: Сковороды для тушения; Блюда для запекания; Наборы кухонной посуды; Сковороды для блинов и оладий; Кастрюли-пароварки; Жаровни; Посуда для соления и ферментации; Гриль-панели и сковороды-гриль; Прессы для гриля; Сковороды для паэльи; Скороварки и автоклавы; Кухонные ковши; Сотейники; Сковороды; Кастрюли; Чайники для плиты; Паровые плиты; Таджины и глиняные горшки; Воки
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Cookware & Bakeware > Cookware: Braiser Pans; Casserole Dishes; Cookware Sets; Crêpe & Blini Pans; Double Boilers; Dutch Ovens; Fermentation & Pickling Crocks; Griddles & Grill Pans; Grill Presses; Paella Pans; Pressure Cookers & Canners; Saucepans; Sauté Pans; Skillets & Frying Pans; Stock Pots; Stovetop Kettles; Stovetop Steamers; Tagines & Clay Cooking Pots; Woks
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Σκεύη μαγειρικής & ζαχαροπλαστικής > Μαγειρικά σκεύη: Κατσαρόλες μπρεζέ; Σκεύη κατσαρόλας; Σετ μαγειρικών σκευών; Φόρμες για κρέπες & μπλίνι; Μπεν μαρί; Χύτρες ολλανδικού τύπου (μαγειρικά σκεύη); Δοχεία ζύμωσης & τουρσί; Πλάκες & τηγάνια γκριλ; Πρέσες γκριλ; Φόρμες παέγιας; Χύτρες & δοχεία κονσερβοποίησης; Κατσαρολάκια; Τηγάνια σοτέ; Ρηχές κατσαρόλες & τηγάνια; Κατσαρόλες αποθήκευσης; Βραστήρες κουζίνας; Ατμομάγειρες εστίας; Ταζίν & πήλινα σκεύη μαγειρικής; Γουόκ
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Utensílios para cozinhar e fazer bolos > Utensílios para cozinhar: Panelas para refogar; Caçarolas; Conjuntos de utensílios para cozinhar; Frigideiras para crepes e blini; Panelas duplas; Caçarolas de ferro fundido; Recipiente em barro para fermentação e pickles; Grelhadores e frigideiras; Prensas para grelhar; Frigideiras para paelha; Panelas de pressão e enlatadores de pressão; Tachos; Frigideiras para saltear; Sertãs e frigideiras; Panelas altas; Chaleiras de fogão; Panelas a vapor para fogão; Terrinas e panelas de barro; Woks
da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Kogegrej og bageforme > Kogegrej: Braiserpander; Ildfaste fade; Kogegrejssæt; Crêpe- og blinispander; Vandbadsgryder; Støbejernsgryder; Gæringskrukker; Grillplader og grillpander; Steakpressere; Paellapander; Trykkogere og trykhenkogning; Kasseroller; Sautépander; Stegepander; Suppegryder; Kedler til komfur; Mælkeskummere til komfurer; Taginer og kogegryder af ler; Wokke
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Utensilios para cocinar y para hornear > Utensilios para cocinar: Cacerolas para brasear; Cacerolas; Batería de cocina; Sartenes para crepes y blinis; Cacerolas para baño María; Ollas de hierro; Vasijas para conservas y fermentación; Planchas; Prensas para barbacoa; Paelleras; Ollas a presión; Cacillos; Sartenes para saltear; Sartenes para freír; Ollas altas; Hervidores de agua; Vaporeras para cocina; Tajines y römertopf; Woks